Montana, session 2025, HB629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Department to amend rule. (1) The department of environmental quality shall amend
ARM 17.36.123 to provide that new water supply and sewage disposal facilities in a proposed subdivision must
be provided by a connection to a public municipal or county water and/or sewer district water supply or public
wastewater system if:
(a) the proposed subdivision requests the connection;
(b) a boundary of the subdivision is within 501 to 1,000 feet of any component of the public
system; and
(c) the public system meets the requirements of ARM 17.36.123(2)(a) and (b).
Section 2. Proposed subdivision connection to county water and/or sewer district system. A
county water and/or sewer district system shall supply water and sewer services to a subdivision proposed for
review under Title 76, chapter 3 or 4, if:
(1) the proposed subdivision requests the connection;
(2) a boundary of the subdivision is within 501 to 1,000 feet of any component of the county
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 629
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 629
system; and
(3) the county system meets the following requirements, as established in administrative rule by
the department of environmental quality:
(a) the system is approved by the department and is in compliance with Title 75, chapter 6, part 1;
and
(b) the managing entity of the system certifies that:
(i) the system has adequate capacity to meet the needs of the proposed subdivision;
(ii) the connections are authorized;
(iii) the system is in compliance with applicable department regulations; and
(iv) an appropriate water right exists for the connection.
Section 3. Proposed subdivision connection to municipal water or sewer system. A municipal
water or sewer system shall supply water and sewer services to a subdivision proposed for review under Title
76, chapter 3 or 4, if:
(1) the proposed subdivision requests the connection;
(2) a boundary of the subdivision is within 501 to 1,000 feet of any component of the municipal
system; and
(3) the municipal system meets the following requirements, as established in administrative rule by
the department of environmental quality:
(a) the system is approved by the department and is in compliance with Title 75, chapter 6, part 1;
and
(b) the managing entity of the system certifies that:
(i) the system has adequate capacity to meet the needs of the proposed subdivision;
(ii) the connections are authorized;
(iii) the system is in compliance with applicable department regulations; and
(iv) an appropriate water right exists for the connection.
Section 4. Codification instruction. (1) [Section 2] is intended to be codified as an integral part of
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 629
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 629
Title 7, chapter 13, part 22, and the provisions of Title 7, chapter 13, part 22, apply to [section 2].
(2) [Section 3] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 7, chapter 13, part 43, and the
provisions of Title 7, chapter 13, part 43, apply to [section 3].
Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 629
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 629, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 629
INTRODUCED BY S. FITZPATRICK
AN ACT REVISING LAWS RELATED TO THE CONNECTION OF A PROPOSED SUBDIVISION TO A COUNTY
OR MUNICIPAL WATER OR SEWER SYSTEM; PROVIDING THAT A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL WATER OR
SEWER SYSTEM SHALL ACCEPT A PROPOSED SUBDIVISION'S REQUEST FOR CONNECTION IN
CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES; DIRECTING AN AMENDMENT TO ARM 17.36.123 TO PROVIDE THAT A
PUBLIC WATER SUPPLY AND WASTEWATER SYSTEM ACCEPT A CONNECTION FROM A PROPOSED
SUBDIVISION UNDER CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES; PROVIDING RULEMAKING AUTHORITY; AND
PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”